Missouri, session 2026, HB3337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 135.1015, to read as follows:
135.1015. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Qualified residential solar property", all property that qualifies for the
federal residential energy property tax credit authorized under Section 25D of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is installed on a home located in the
state to produce electricity from sunlight, including inverters, solar panels, utility
meters, and other associated devices;
(2) "Qualified residential solar property expenditures", for any qualified
taxpayer in a given tax year, the amount spent on qualified residential solar property
that also qualifies for the federal residential energy property tax credit authorized
under Section 25D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) "Qualified taxpayer", any individual subject to the state income tax imposed
under chapter 143 who has qualified residential solar property expenditures that qualify
for the residential energy property tax credit under Section 25D of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended;
(4) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3337 2
2. A qualified taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax credit under this section
against the taxpayer's state tax liability in the following amounts:
(1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, but on or before
December 31, 2032, thirty percent of the qualified residential solar property
expenditures made by the qualified taxpayer during such year;
(2) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2033, but on or before
December 31, 2033, thirty-five percent of the qualified residential solar property
expenditures made by the qualified taxpayer during such year; and
(3) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2034, forty percent of the
qualified residential solar property expenditures made by the qualified taxpayer during
such year.
3. Tax credits issued under the provisions of this section shall be refundable but
no tax credit claimed under this section shall be carried forward to any subsequent tax
year.
4. No tax credit claimed under this section shall be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed.
5. The department of revenue shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section including, but not limited to, rules
relating to the verification of a taxpayer's qualified amount. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
December thirty-first six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized
by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the provisions authorized under this
section are sunset.
✔